Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-2328
Retirement system; elected officials and employees having regular term; when act operative.

The provisions of the County Employees Retirement Act pertaining to elected officials or other employees having a regular term of office shall be so interpreted as to effectuate its general purpose and to take effect as soon as the same may become operative under the Constitution of the State of Nebraska.

Laws 1965, c. 94, § 28, p. 410;

Laws 1985, LB 347, § 15.